Florida, session 2026, SB1368.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 49 50 Section 1.âSection 316.1936, Florida Statutes, is amended 51 to read: 52 316.1936âPossession of open containers of alcoholic 53 beverages or THC-infused beverages in vehicles prohibited; 54 penalties.â 55 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 56 (a)ââOpen containerâ means any container of an alcoholic 57 beverage or a THC-infused beverage which is immediately capable 58 of being consumed from, or the seal of which has been broken. 59 (b)ââRoadâ means a way open to travel by the public, 60 including, but not limited to, a street, a highway, or an alley. 61 The term includes associated sidewalks, the roadbed, the right 62 of-way, and all culverts, drains, sluices, ditches, water 63 storage areas, embankments, slopes, retaining walls, bridges, 64 tunnels, and viaducts necessary for the maintenance of travel, 65 and all ferries used in connection therewith. 66 (c)ââTHC-infused beverageâ means a soft drink, soda, juice, 67 tea, or other beverage intended for ingestion which contains 68 low-THC cannabis as defined in s. 381.986. 69 (2)(a)âIt is unlawful and punishable as provided in this 70 section for any person to do either of the following while 71 operating a vehicle in this state or while being a passenger in 72 or on a vehicle being operated in this state: 73 1.âPossess an open container of an alcoholic beverage or a 74 THC-infused beverage. 75 2.âConsume an alcoholic beverage or a THC-infused beverage 76 while operating a vehicle in the state or while a passenger in 77 or on a vehicle being operated in the state. 78 (b)âIt is unlawful and punishable as provided in this 79 section for any person to do either of the following while 80 seated in or on a motor vehicle that is parked or stopped within 81 a road: 82 1.âPossess an open container of an alcoholic beverage or a 83 THC-infused beverage. 84 2.âConsume an alcoholic beverage or a THC-infused beverage 85 while seated in or on a motor vehicle that is parked or stopped 86 within a road as defined in this section. 87 (c)âNotwithstanding the prohibition contained in this 88 section, passengers in vehicles designed, maintained, and used 89 primarily for the transportation of persons for compensation and 90 in motor homes are exempt. 91 (3)âAn open container shall be considered to be in the 92 possession of the operator of a vehicle if the container is not 93 in the possession of a passenger and is not located in a locked 94 glove compartment, locked trunk, or other locked nonpassenger 95 area of the vehicle. 96 (4)âAn open container shall be considered to be in the 97 possession of a passenger of a vehicle if the container is in 98 the physical control of the passenger. 99 (5)âThis section shall not apply to: 100 (a)âA passenger of a vehicle in which the driver is 101 operating the vehicle pursuant to a contract to provide 102 transportation for passengers and such driver holds a valid 103 commercial driver license with a passenger endorsement issued in 104 accordance with the requirements of chapter 322; 105 (b)âA passenger of a bus in which the driver holds a valid 106 commercial driver license with a passenger endorsement issued in 107 accordance with the requirements of chapter 322; or 108 (c)âA passenger of a self-contained motor home which is in 109 excess of 21 feet in length. 110 (6)âAny operator of a vehicle who violates this section is 111 guilty of a noncriminal moving traffic violation, punishable as 112 provided in chapter 318. A passenger of a vehicle who violates 113 this section is guilty of a nonmoving traffic violation, 114 punishable as provided in chapter 318. 115 (7)âA county or municipality may adopt an ordinance which 116 imposes more stringent restrictions on the possession of 117 alcoholic beverages or THC-infused beverages in vehicles than 118 those imposed by this section. 119 (8)âNothing in this section prohibits the enforcement of s. 120 316.302. 121 (9)âAn alcoholic beverage that has been sealed by a 122 licensee or the employee of a licensee and is transported 123 pursuant to s. 564.09, s. 561.20(2)(a)4., or s. 565.045(1) is 124 not an open container under this section. 125 Section 2.âParagraph (n) of subsection (1) of section 126 500.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 127 500.03âDefinitions; construction; applicability.â 128 (1)âFor the purpose of this chapter, the term: 129 (n)ââFoodâ includes: 130 1.âArticles used for food or drink for human consumption; 131 2.âChewing gum; 132 3.âArticles used for components of any such article; 133 4.âArticles for which health claims are made, which claims 134 are approved by the Secretary of the United States Department of 135 Health and Human Services and which claims are made in 136 accordance with s. 343(r) of the federal act, and which are not 137 considered drugs solely because their labels or labeling contain 138 health claims; 139 5.âDietary supplements as defined in 21 U.S.C. s. 140 321(ff)(1) and (2); and 141 6.âConsumable THC products, excluding THC-infused beverages 142 Hemp extract as defined in s. 581.218(1) s. 581.217. 143 144 The term includes any raw, cooked, or processed edible 145 substance; ice; any beverage; or any ingredient used, intended 146 for use, or sold for human consumption. 147 Section 3.âSection 581.218, Florida Statutes, is created to 148 read: 149 581.218âRestrictions on the sale of THC-infused beverages. 150 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term âTHC 151 infused beverageâ means a soft drink, soda, juice, tea, or other 152 beverage intended for ingestion which contains low-THC cannabis 153 as defined in s. 381.986. 154 (2)âPROHIBITIONS.â 155 (a)âIt is unlawful for any person to: 156 1.âSell, give, serve, or permit to be served THC-infused 157 beverages to a person under 21 years of age, or permit a person 158 under 21 years of age to consume such beverages. A person who 159 violates this subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the second 160 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. A 161 person who violates this subparagraph a second or subsequent 162 time within 1 year after a prior conviction commits a 163 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 164 775.082 or s. 775.083. 165 2.âPossess THC-infused beverages if such person is under 21 166 years of age. Any person who violates this subparagraph commits 167 a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 168 775.082 or s. 775.083. A second or subsequent violation of this 169 subparagraph less than 1 year after the first violation is a 170 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 171 775.082 or s. 775.083. 172 3.âSell, at retail, THC-infused beverages at a location 173 other than premises licensed to sell alcoholic beverages under 174 s. 565.02(1). Unpermitted business sales, street sales, or 175 festival sales are prohibited. 176 (b)âTHC-infused beverages may not contain alcoholic 177 beverages or intoxicating beverages as defined in s. 561.01(4) 178 and (5), respectively. 179 (3)âRETAIL SALE OF THC-INFUSED BEVERAGES.â 180 (a)âAn establishment permitted to sell THC-infused 181 beverages may not be located within 500 feet of a school or day 182 care facility. 183 (b)âRetail sales of THC-infused beverages or transfers of 184 THC-infused beverages from retailer to consumer must take place 185 at a licensed retail location in a face-to-face transaction. The 186 delivery of THC-infused beverages to consumers, directly or 187 indirectly, is prohibited. 188 (c)âA retail licensee permitted to sell THC-infused 189 beverages may not apply for or hold either of the following: 190 1.âA license to distribute such beverages under s. 191 581.217(7)(b). 192 2.âA food permit to manufacture such beverages under 193 chapter 500 and rule 5K-4, Florida Administrative Code. 194 (4)âTHC-INFUSED BEVERAGE DISTRIBUTOR.â 195 (a)âTHC-infused beverages may be distributed in this state 196 only by a distributor licensed under the Beverage Law as 197 described in s. 561.14(2). A distributor permitted to distribute 198 THC-infused beverages must own or lease a licensed premises in 199 this state. 200 (b)âA distributor of THC-infused beverages may not: 201 1.âAssist any retail vendor by any gift or loan of money or 202 property of any description, including equipment, fixtures, or 203 furnishings. 204 2.âSell or provide THC-infused beverages to a retail vendor 205 who does not hold an active hemp permit. 206 3.âMake consignment sales to retail vendors of THC-infused 207 beverages, including any right of return or exchange because the 208 product is overstocked or slow moving. 209 4.âGive a retailer of THC-infused beverages anything of 210 value to promote THC-infused beverages or provide shelf space or 211 floor space to stock or promote THC-infused beverages. 212 5.âApply for or hold a food permit to manufacture THC 213 infused beverages under chapter 500 and rule 5K-4, Florida 214 Administrative Code. 215 (c)âDistributors shall pay a tax at the rate of 5 cents per 216 milligram of hemp-derived cannabinoid in each THC-infused 217 beverage sold at wholesale in this state. The tax shall be paid 218 to the Division of Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco within the 219 Department of Business and Professional Regulation monthly on or 220 before the 10th day of the following month. 221 (d)âCredit for the sale of THC-infused beverages may be 222 extended by distributors to any vendor up to, but not including, 223 the 10th day after the calendar week within which such sale was 224 made. 225 (5)âTHC-INFUSED BEVERAGE RETAIL VENDOR.âA retail vendor of 226 THC-infused beverages may not: 227 (a)âPurchase or otherwise obtain such beverages from a 228 person not licensed as a distributor licensed under the Beverage 229 Law as described in s. 561.14(2). 230 (b)âAttempt to return to a distributor or exchange a THC 231 infused beverage because the product is overstocked or slow 232 moving. 233 (6)âTESTING AND PURITY.âTHC-infused beverages manufactured, 234 marketed, distributed, or sold at retail in this state must 235 comply with all testing, purity, THC limit, packaging, and 236 labeling requirements in s. 581.217. 237 (7)âCIVIL PENALTIES.âA person or entity that violates this 238 section is subject to a civil penalty levied by the Division of 239 Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco within the Department of 240 Business and Professional Regulation according to the following 241 schedule: 242 (a)âOne thousand dollars for a first offense. 243 (b)âFive thousand dollars for a second offense. 244 (c)âTen thousand dollars for a third or subsequent offense. 245 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 246 made by this act to section 316.1936, Florida Statutes, in a 247 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 316.2069, Florida 248 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 249 316.2069âCommercial megacycles.âThe governing body of a 250 municipality, or the governing board of a county with respect to 251 an unincorporated portion of the county, may authorize the 252 operation of a commercial megacycle on roads or streets within 253 the respective jurisdictions if the requirements of subsections 254 (1)-(3) are met: 255 (5)âSection 316.1936 does not apply to the passengers being 256 transported in a commercial megacycle while operating in 257 accordance with this section. 258 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.